Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 34.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2407
Certificate; contents; term; revocation.

A certificate issued in accordance with section 69-2404 shall contain the holder's name, address, and date of birth and the effective date of the certificate. A certificate shall authorize the holder to acquire any number of handguns during the period that the certificate is valid. The certificate shall be valid throughout the state and shall become invalid three years after its effective date. If the chief of police or sheriff who issued the certificate determines that the applicant has become disqualified for the certificate under section 69-2404, he or she may immediately revoke the certificate and require the holder to surrender the certificate immediately. Revocation may be appealed pursuant to section 69-2406.

Laws 1991, LB 355, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB63, § 34.
May 28, 2009